Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.080

Cumulative reserve fund—Annual levy for—Application of budget law.

An item for said cumulative reserve fund may be included in the city or town's annual budget or estimate of amounts required to meet public expense for the ensuing year and a tax levy made within the limits and as authorized by law for said item; and said item and levy may be repeated from year to year until, in the judgment of the legislative body of the city or town, the amount required for the specified purpose or purposes has been raised or accumulated. Any moneys in said fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse nor shall the same be a surplus available or which may be used for any other purpose or purposes than those specified, except as herein provided.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.080. Prior: 1953 c 38 s 2; 1941 c 60 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9213-6.]